Hawaii statutes.
[§457G-7] License revocation or suspension;
reinstatement; probation. (a) In addition to any other actions authorized
by law, any license issued under this chapter may be revoked or suspended by
the director at any time for any cause authorized by law, including but not
limited to the following:

(1) Obtaining a fee on the assurance that a
manifestly incurable disease can be permanently cured;

(2) Wilfully betraying patient confidentiality;

(3) Making an untruthful and improbable statement in
advertising one's practice or business;

(4) False, fraudulent, or deceptive advertising;

(5) Being habituated to the excessive use of drugs or
alcohol or being or having been addicted to, dependent on, or a habitual user
of a narcotic, barbiturate, amphetamine, hallucinogen, or other drug having
similar effects;

(6) Practicing occupational therapy while the ability
to practice is impaired by alcohol, drugs, or mental instability;

(7) Procuring a license through fraud,
misrepresentation, or deceit, or knowingly permitting an unlicensed person to
practice occupational therapy;

(8) Professional misconduct, gross negligence, or
manifest incapacity in the practice of occupational therapy;

(9) Conduct or practice contrary to recognized
standards of ethics for the practice of occupational therapy in the United
States; or

(10) Violation of this chapter, chapter 436B, or any
rule or order of the director.

(b) To reinstate a suspended license, or to
grant licensure to an applicant whose license was previously revoked, the
director may require further education or training or require proof of
competence in performance.

(c) In lieu of revoking or suspending a
license, the director may place the licensee on probation, the terms of which
may require observation of the licensee by a licensed occupational therapist.

(d) Any licensee or applicant who violates
this section may be fined not more than $1,000 per violation in addition to any
other fine or fee imposed. [L 2014, c 209, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next